Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1804
Permit; duration; abrogation; renewal.

The permits, issued under the provisions of sections 71-1802 and 71-1803, shall be valid for the period of one year, or part thereof, expiring on December 31 of each year. However, all such permits must remain subject to abrogation and renewal, if in the opinion of the Department of Health and Human Services or State Veterinarian there is sufficient warrant for such abrogation or renewal.

Laws 1943, c. 153, § 4, p. 562;

R.S.1943, § 71-1804;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 581;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 496.